Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-606
District; petition requirements.

The petition for the original creation of a district shall conform to the requirements of section 32-628.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 3, p. 339;

Laws 1937, c. 152, § 3, p. 579;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-703;

Laws 1943, c. 145, § 1(4), p. 508;

R.S.1943, § 70-606;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 581.